Missouri, session 2026, HB1809.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 578.350, RSMo, is repealed and four new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 197.125, 197.130, 578.350, and 595.222, to read as follows:
197.125. Any entity that operates an emergency room shall provide three hours
of annual training on the collection of forensic evidence to all personnel employed in a
capacity that requires them to assist in procedures involving the collection of forensic
evidence in such emergency room.
197.130. Any entity that operates an emergency room shall possess and maintain
a secure storage unit capable of storing forensic evidence collected by personnel during
the course of treatment of a gunshot wound patient or a stab wound patient in the
emergency room.
578.350. 1. A person licensed under chapter 334 or 335 who treats a person for a
wound inflicted by gunshot or for a stabbing wound that is at least one inch deep commits
the infraction of medical deception if he or she knowingly fails to immediately report to a
local law enforcement official the name and address of the person, if known, and if unknown,
a description of the person, together with an explanation of the nature of the wound and the
circumstances under which the treatment was rendered.
2. A person licensed under chapter 334 or 335 who, in good faith, makes a report
under this section shall have immunity from civil liability that otherwise might result from
such report and shall have the same immunity with respect to any good faith participation in
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1809 2
any judicial proceeding in which the reported [gunshot] wound is an issue. Notwithstanding
the provisions of subdivision (5) of section 491.060, the existence of a physician-patient
relationship shall not prevent a physician from submitting the report required in this section,
or testifying regarding information acquired from a patient treated for a [gunshot] reported
wound if such testimony is otherwise admissible.
595.222. 1. Any entity that operates an emergency room shall have access to
evidentiary collection kits to be used to collect evidence of a gunshot wound or a
stabbing wound that is at least one inch deep.
2. Evidentiary collection kits shall be developed and made available, subject to
appropriation, to emergency rooms by the department of health and senior services.
Such kits shall be distributed along with forms and procedures developed by the
department of public safety for gathering evidence during the examination of a victim of
a gunshot wound or a stabbing wound that is at least one inch deep.
3. The department of public safety shall have authority to promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of
a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔